Nebraska, session 109, LB1110.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1110 LB1110
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) The Department of Health and Human Services and the
Department of Revenue, for the purpose of the proper administration of
the laws administered by each agency, may disclose confidential
information about persons, businesses, and state and local subdivisions
to the other agency. The receiving agency shall not use any confidential
information obtained from the disclosing agency except for purposes
directly connected with the proper administration of the laws
administered by the receiving agency.
(2) The disclosures allowed under this section may be made
notwithstanding any other provision of law of this state regarding
disclosure of information by either agency. Any information received by
either agency under this section shall be considered confidential by the
receiving agency, and any individual who discloses such information other
than as specifically allowed by this section or other laws of this state
shall be subject to the penalties normally imposed on individuals who
improperly disclose such information.
Sec. 2. (1) The Department of Revenue shall add a collection fee in
the amount of twenty-five dollars or ten percent of the tax liability,
whichever is greater, to all delinquent tax claims regardless of whether
the claim has been assigned to a collection agency under sections
77-377.01 to 77-377.04. For purposes of this subsection, delinquent tax
claim has the same meaning as in section 77-377.01.
(2) In addition to the collection fee in subsection (1) of this
section, the Department of Revenue shall add the actual costs incurred by
the department to collect delinquent taxes to the tax liability at the
time such costs are incurred.
(3) The Department of Revenue shall add an assessment fee in the
amount of twenty-five dollars or ten percent of the tax liability,
whichever is greater, to all assessments and notices of deficiency when
issued. If the assessment or notice of deficiency becomes due and owing,
the assessment fee shall be recalculated on the tax liability as of the
-2-

LB1110 LB1110
2026 2026
date when the assessment or notice of deficiency becomes due and owing.
(4)(a) The Tax Commissioner may require any person filing a petition
for redetermination of (i) a notice and demand for payment issued
pursuant to section 77-1783.01 or (ii) a notice of a deficiency
determination issued pursuant to the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, to
remit a filing fee of forty dollars to the Department of Revenue.
(b) A person may file an application with the Department of Revenue
claiming he or she is indigent. A person determined by the Department of
Revenue to be indigent shall not be required to remit the filing fee
required by this subsection. For purposes of this subdivision, indigent
means the inability to financially pursue the petition for
redetermination without prejudicing the person's ability to provide
economic necessities for the person or the person's family. In making its
determination, the department shall consider (i) the person's income,
(ii) the availability of other resources to the person including, but not
limited to, real and personal property, bank accounts, social security
benefits, and unemployment or other benefits, (iii) the person's normal
living expenses, (iv) the person's outstanding debts, (v) the number and
age of the person's dependents, and (vi) other relevant circumstances.
(5) All applications for a waiver of interest or penalty pursuant to
the statutory authority of the Tax Commissioner shall be submitted with a
fee of twenty-five dollars.
(6) All written requests for a certificate stating no tax is due
which are filed pursuant to section 77-2707 shall be submitted with a fee
of twenty-five dollars.
(7) The fees and costs collected by the Department of Revenue
pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for
credit to the Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund.
(8) Beginning on January 1, 2027, and on January 1 of successive
years, the Department of Revenue shall increase the fees provided for in
this section by the percentage change, if any, as of August of the
-3-

LB1110 LB1110
2026 2026
previous year over the level as of August of the year preceding that year
in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, Midwest Region, as
published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States
Department of Labor.
Sec. 3. Section 9-1,101, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
9-1,101 (1) The Nebraska Bingo Act, the Nebraska County and City
Lottery Act, the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, the Nebraska Pickle
Card Lottery Act, the Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act, and section
9-701 shall be administered and enforced by the Charitable Gaming
Division of the Department of Revenue, which division is hereby created.
The Department of Revenue shall make annual reports to the Governor,
Legislature, Auditor of Public Accounts, and Attorney General on all tax
revenue received, expenses incurred, and other activities relating to the
administration and enforcement of such acts. The report submitted to the
Legislature shall be submitted electronically.
(2) The Charitable Gaming Operations Fund is hereby created. Any
money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(3)(a) Forty percent of the taxes collected pursuant to sections
9-239, 9-344, 9-429, and 9-648 shall be available to the Charitable
Gaming Division for administering and enforcing the acts listed in
subsection (1) of this section and providing administrative support for
the Nebraska Commission on Problem Gambling. The remaining sixty percent
shall be transferred to the General Fund. Any portion of the forty
percent not used by the division in the administration and enforcement of
such acts and section shall be distributed as provided in this
subsection.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2019, through June 30, 2026, on or before the
last day of the last month of each calendar quarter, the State Treasurer
-4-

LB1110 LB1110
2026 2026
shall transfer one hundred thousand dollars from the Charitable Gaming
Operations Fund to the Compulsive Gamblers Assistance Fund.
(c) Any money remaining in the Charitable Gaming Operations Fund
after the transfer pursuant to subdivision (b) of this subsection not
used by the Charitable Gaming Division in its administration and
enforcement duties pursuant to this section may be transferred to the
General Fund and the Compulsive Gamblers Assistance Fund at the direction
of the Legislature.
(4) The Tax Commissioner shall employ investigators who shall be
vested with the authority and power of a law enforcement officer to carry
out the laws of this state administered by the Tax Commissioner or the
Department of Revenue and to enforce sections 28-1101 to 28-1117 relating
to possession of a gambling device. For purposes of enforcing sections
28-1101 to 28-1117, the authority of the investigators shall be limited
to investigating possession of a gambling device, notifying local law
enforcement authorities, and reporting suspected violations to the county
attorney for prosecution.
(5) The Charitable Gaming Division may charge a fee for publications
and listings it produces. The fee shall not exceed the cost of
publication and distribution of such items. The division may also charge
a fee for making a copy of any record in its possession equal to the
actual cost per page. The division shall remit the fees to the State
Treasurer for credit to the Charitable Gaming Operations Fund.
(6) The taxes collected and available to the Charitable Gaming
Division pursuant to section 77-3012 shall be used by the division for
enforcement of the Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act and maintenance of
the central server established pursuant to section 77-3013.
(6) (7) For administrative purposes only, the Nebraska Commission on
Problem Gambling shall be located within the Charitable Gaming Division.
The division shall provide office space, furniture, equipment, and
stationery and other necessary supplies for the commission. Commission
-5-

LB1110 LB1110
2026 2026
staff shall be appointed, supervised, and terminated by the director of
the Gamblers Assistance Program pursuant to section 9-1004.
Sec. 4. Section 77-367, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-367 (1) The Department of Revenue may contract to procure
products and services to develop, deploy, or administer systems or
programs which identify nonfilers of returns, underreporters, or
nonpayers of taxes administered by the department or improper or
fraudulent payments made through programs administered by the department.
The department shall enter into at least one such contract by December
31, 2014, and such contract shall be for the purpose of identifying
nonfilers of returns with a tax liability in any amount or underreporters
or nonpayers of taxes with an outstanding tax liability of at least five
thousand dollars. Fees for services, reimbursements, costs incurred by
the department, or other remuneration may be funded from the amount of
tax, penalty, interest, or other recovery actually collected and shall be
paid only after the amount is collected. The Legislature intends to
appropriate an amount from the tax, penalty, interest, and other recovery
actually collected, not to exceed the amount collected, which is
sufficient to pay for services, reimbursements, costs incurred by the
department, or other remuneration pursuant to this section. Vendors
entering into a contract with the department pursuant to this section are
subject to the requirements and penalties of the confidentiality laws of
this state regarding tax information.
(2) Ten percent of all proceeds received during each calendar year
due to the contracts entered into pursuant to this section shall be
deposited in the Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund for purposes of
identifying nonfilers, underreporters, nonpayers, and improper or
fraudulent payments.
(3) The Tax Commissioner shall submit electronically an annual
report to the Revenue Committee of the Legislature and Appropriations
-6-

LB1110 LB1110
2026 2026
Committee of the Legislature on the amount of dollars generated during
the previous fiscal year pursuant to this section.
Sec. 5. Section 77-377.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-377.01 The Tax Commissioner may, for the purposes of collecting
delinquent taxes due from a taxpayer and in addition to exercising those
powers in section 77-27,107, contract with any collection agency licensed
pursuant to the Collection Agency Act, within or without the state, for
the collection of such delinquent taxes, including penalties and interest
thereon. Such delinquent tax claims may be assigned to the collection
agency, for the purpose of litigation in the agency's name and at the
agency's expense, as a means of facilitating and expediting the
collection process.
For purposes of this section, a delinquent tax claim shall be
defined as a tax liability that is due and owing for a period longer than
six months and for which the taxpayer has been mailed at least three
notices requesting payment. At least one notice shall include a statement
that the matter of such taxpayer's delinquency may be referred to a
collection agency in the taxpayer's home state.
Sec. 6. Section 77-377.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-377.02 (1) Fees for services, reimbursements, or other
remuneration to such collection agency shall be based on the amount of
tax, penalty, and interest actually collected and shall not be subject to
the requirements of section 73-203 or 73-204. Each contract entered into
between the Tax Commissioner and the collection agency shall provide for
the payment of fees for such services, reimbursements, or other
remuneration not in excess of fifty percent of the total amount of
delinquent taxes, penalties, and interest actually collected.
(2) If, at the time a delinquent tax claim is assigned to a
collection agency, any collection fees or costs were added to the tax
-7-

LB1110 LB1110
2026 2026
liability pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of section 2 of this act,
then a portion of such fees and costs, up to fifty percent of the balance
of the delinquent tax claim, shall be added to the amount owed and
collected from the taxpayer along with the fees for the collection
agency's services as provided in the contract. The collection fees and
costs added to the amount owed and collected from the taxpayer pursuant
to this subsection shall be remitted and deposited in the same manner as
the taxes being collected. For purposes of this subsection, delinquent
tax claim shall have the same meaning as in section 77-377.01.
(3) (2) All funds collected, less the fees for the collection
agency's services as provided in the contract, shall be remitted to the
Tax Commissioner within forty-five days from the date of collection from
a taxpayer. Forms to be used for such remittances shall be prescribed by
the Tax Commissioner.
Sec. 7. Section 77-3,109, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-3,109 (1) The Department of Revenue may charge persons and state
agencies for the following publications of the Department of Revenue:
Department of Revenue Annual Report, Package XN, Department of Revenue
Tax Expenditure Report, and the Department of Revenue State Funds
Booklet. The Tax Commissioner shall set the price of such publications
which shall be the cost of production.
(2) The Department of Revenue shall remit all funds received under
this section to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of
Revenue Enforcement Fund.
Sec. 8. Section 77-3,118, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-3,118 (1) The Department of Revenue may charge persons and state
agencies for any listings made by the department of information that is
not confidential. The Tax Commissioner shall set the price of such
listings which shall be the cost of production.
-8-

LB1110 LB1110
2026 2026
(2) The Department of Revenue shall remit all funds received under
this section to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of
Revenue Enforcement Fund.
Sec. 9. Section 77-27,107, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-27,107 (1) When notice and demand for the payment of income tax
is given to a taxpayer and it appears to the Tax Commissioner that it is
not practicable to locate property of the taxpayer sufficient in amount
to cover the amount of tax due, he or she shall send a copy of the notice
provided for in the Uniform State Tax Lien Registration and Enforcement
Act to the taxpayer at his or her last-known address together with a
notice that such notice has been filed with the appropriate filing
officer. Thereafter, the Tax Commissioner may authorize the institution
of any action or proceeding to collect or enforce such claim in any place
and by any procedure that a civil judgment of a court of record of this
state could be collected or enforced.
(2) The Tax Commissioner may register a claim for any delinquent
taxes due and owing as a judgment in the office of the clerk of the
district court of Lancaster County in the same manner as a foreign
judgment is filed under the Nebraska Uniform Enforcement of Foreign
Judgments Act.
(3) The Tax Commissioner may also in his or her discretion designate
agents or retain counsel for the purpose of collecting any income taxes
due under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967. He or she may fix the
compensation of such agents and counsel to be paid out of money
appropriated or otherwise lawfully available for payment thereof and he
or she may require of them bonds or other security for the faithful
performance of their duties.
(4) The Tax Commissioner may enter into agreements with the tax
departments of other states and the District of Columbia for the
collection of income taxes from persons found in those jurisdictions who
-9-

LB1110 LB1110
2026 2026
are delinquent in the payment of income taxes imposed under such act.
Sec. 10. Section 77-3012, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3012 (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this
section, a tax is hereby imposed and levied, in the amount and in
accordance with this section, upon the net operating revenue of all cash
devices operating within the State of Nebraska for profit or gain either
directly or indirectly received. The tax shall be paid in the amount and
manner specified in this section.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section,
beginning on and after July 1, 2025, any distributor of a cash device,
and any operator of a cash device if the operator is not subject to a
revenue-sharing or other agreement with a distributor who is paying the
tax, shall pay a tax for each cash device in operation each calendar
quarter during the taxable year. The tax shall be collected by the
department and due and payable on January 1, April 1, July 1, and October
1 of each year on each cash device in operation during the preceding
calendar quarter. For each cash device put into operation on a date
subsequent to a quarterly due date that has not been included in
computing the tax imposed and levied by the Mechanical Amusement Device
Tax Act, the tax shall be due and payable on the immediately succeeding
quarterly due date.
(3) The amount of the tax imposed and levied under this section
shall be five percent of the net operating revenue for each cash device.
The quarterly tax shall be submitted on a form prescribed by the Tax
Commissioner documenting the total gross and net operating revenue for
that quarter.
(4) The Tax Commissioner shall remit the taxes collected pursuant to
this section to the State Treasurer for credit as follows:
(a) Twenty percent to the Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund
Charitable Gaming Operations Fund for enforcement of the act and
-10-

LB1110 LB1110
2026 2026
maintenance of the central server;
(b) Two and one-half percent to the Compulsive Gamblers Assistance
Fund;
(c) Two and one-half percent to the General Fund;
(d) Ten percent to the Nebraska Tourism Commission Promotional Cash
Fund;
(e) Forty percent to the Property Tax Credit Cash Fund; and
(f) The remaining twenty-five percent to the county treasurer of the
county in which the cash device is located to be distributed as follows:
(i) If the cash device is located completely within an unincorporated
area of a county, the remaining twenty-five percent shall be distributed
to the county in which the cash device is located, or (ii) if the cash
device is located within the limits of a city or village in such county,
one-half of the remaining twenty-five percent shall be distributed to
such county and one-half of the remaining twenty-five percent shall be
distributed to the city or village in which such cash device is located.
(5) This section does not apply to cash devices operated by a
fraternal benefit society organized and licensed under sections 44-1072
to 44-10,109 or a recognized veterans organization as defined in section
80-401.01.
Sec. 11. Section 77-4025, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-4025 (1) There is hereby created a cash fund in the Department of
Revenue to be known as the Tobacco Products Administration Cash Fund. All
revenue collected or received by the Tax Commissioner from the license
fees, certification fees, and taxes imposed by the Tobacco Products Tax
Act shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Tobacco
Products Administration Cash Fund, except that all such revenue relating
to electronic nicotine delivery systems shall be remitted to the State
Treasurer for credit to the General Fund. All amounts credited to the
Tobacco Products Administration Cash Fund, before credits and refunds,
-11-

LB1110 LB1110
2026 2026
shall be transferred to the Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund.
(2) All costs required for administration of the Tobacco Products
Tax Act shall be paid from the Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund
Tobacco Products Administration Cash Fund. Credits and refunds allowed
under the act shall be paid from the Department of Revenue Enforcement
Fund Tobacco Products Administration Cash Fund. Any receipts, after
credits and refunds, in excess of the amounts sufficient to cover the
costs of administration may be transferred to the General Fund at the
direction of the Legislature.
(3) The State Treasurer shall transfer nine million five hundred
thousand dollars from the Tobacco Products Administration Cash Fund to
the General Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but on or before June 30,
2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services. The State Treasurer shall transfer nine million five hundred
thousand dollars from the Tobacco Products Administration Cash Fund to
the General Fund on or after July 1, 2026, but on or before June 30,
2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services. The State Treasurer shall transfer nine million dollars from
the Tobacco Products Administration Cash Fund to the General Fund on or
after July 1, 2027, but on or before June 30, 2028, on such dates and in
such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services. The State
Treasurer shall transfer nine million dollars from the Tobacco Products
Administration Cash Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2028,
but on or before June 30, 2029, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(4) Any money in the Tobacco Products Administration Cash Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
-12-

LB1110 LB1110
2026 2026
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 12. Section 77-5601, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-5601 (1) From August 1, 2004, through October 31, 2004, there
shall be conducted a tax amnesty program with regard to taxes due and
owing that have not been reported to the Department of Revenue. Any
person applying for tax amnesty shall pay all unreported taxes that were
due on or before April 1, 2004. Any person that applies for tax amnesty
and is accepted by the Tax Commissioner shall have any penalties and
interest waived on unreported and delinquent taxes notwithstanding any
other provisions of law to the contrary.
(2) To be eligible for the tax amnesty provided by this section, the
person shall apply for amnesty within the amnesty period, file a return
for each taxable period for which the amnesty is requested by December
31, 2004, if no return has been filed, and pay in full all taxes for
which amnesty is sought with the return or within thirty days after the
application if a return was filed prior to the amnesty period. Tax
amnesty shall not be available for any person that is under civil or
criminal audit, investigation, or prosecution for unreported or
delinquent taxes by this state or the United States Government on or
before April 16, 2004.
(3) The department shall not seek civil or criminal prosecution
against any person for any taxable period for which amnesty has been
granted. The Tax Commissioner shall develop forms for applying for the
tax amnesty program, develop procedures for qualification for tax
amnesty, and conduct a public awareness campaign publicizing the program.
(4) If a person elects to participate in the amnesty program, the
election shall constitute an express and irrevocable relinquishment of
all administrative and judicial rights to challenge the imposition of the
tax or its amount. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the department
-13-

LB1110 LB1110
2026 2026
from adjusting a return as a result of any state or federal audit.
(5)(a) Except for any local option sales tax collected and returned
to the appropriate municipality and any motor vehicle fuel, diesel fuel,
and compressed fuel taxes, which shall be deposited in the Highway Trust
Fund or Highway Allocation Fund as provided by law, no less than eighty
percent of all revenue received pursuant to the tax amnesty program shall
be deposited in the General Fund and ten percent, not to exceed five
hundred thousand dollars, shall be deposited in the Department of Revenue
Enforcement Fund. Any amount that would otherwise be deposited in the
Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund that is in excess of the five-
hundred-thousand-dollar limitation shall be deposited in the General
Fund.
(b) For fiscal year 2005-06, all proceeds in the Department of
Revenue Enforcement Fund shall be appropriated to the department for
purposes of employing investigators, agents, and auditors and otherwise
increasing personnel for enforcement of the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967.
(c) For fiscal years after fiscal year 2005-06, twenty percent of
all proceeds received during the previous calendar year due to the
efforts of auditors and investigators hired pursuant to subdivision (5)
(b) of this section, not to exceed seven hundred fifty thousand dollars,
shall be deposited in the Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund for
purposes of employing investigators and auditors or continuing such
employment for purposes of increasing enforcement of the act.
(d) Ten percent of all proceeds received during each calendar year
due to the contracts entered into pursuant to section 77-367 shall be
deposited in the Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund for purposes of
identifying nonfilers of returns, underreporters, nonpayers of taxes, and
improper or fraudulent payments.
(6)(a) The department shall prepare a report by April 1, 2005, and
by February 1 of each year thereafter detailing the results of the tax
amnesty program and the subsequent enforcement efforts. For the report
-14-

LB1110 LB1110
2026 2026
due April 1, 2005, the report shall include (i) the amount of revenue
obtained as a result of the tax amnesty program broken down by tax
program, (ii) the amount obtained from instate taxpayers and from out-of-
state taxpayers, and (iii) the amount obtained from individual taxpayers
and from business enterprises.
(b) For reports due in subsequent years, the report shall include
(i) the number of personnel hired for purposes of subdivision (5)(b) of
this section and their duties, (ii) a description of lists, software,
programming, computer equipment, and other technological methods acquired
and the purposes of each, and (iii) the amount of new revenue obtained as
a result of the new personnel and acquisitions during the prior calendar
year, broken down into the same categories as described in subdivision
(6)(a) of this section.
(7)(a) (7) The Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund is created.
The money in the fund shall be used by the Department of Revenue for the
administration and enforcement of any activity or function administered
by the Tax Commissioner.
(b) Transfers may be made from the Department of Revenue Enforcement
Fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. The
Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund may receive transfers from the
Civic and Community Center Financing Fund at the direction of the
Legislature for the purpose of administering the Sports Arena Facility
Financing Assistance Act. The Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund
shall include any money credited to the fund (a) under section 77-2703,
and such money shall be used by the Department of Revenue to defray the
costs incurred to implement Laws 2019, LB237, (b) under the Mechanical
Amusement Device Tax Act, and such money shall be used by the department
to defray the costs incurred to implement and enforce Laws 2019, LB538,
and any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated to carry out Laws
2019, LB538, (c) under section 77-2906, and such money shall be used by
the Department of Revenue to defray the costs incurred to implement Laws
-15-

LB1110 LB1110
2026 2026
2020, LB310, (d) under the Kratom Consumer Protection Act, and such money
shall be used by the Department of Revenue to defray the costs incurred
to administer the act, and (e) under section 77-3,124.
(c) Any money in the Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment
earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the
General Fund.
(8) For purposes of this section, taxes mean any taxes collected by
the department, including, but not limited to state and local sales and
use taxes, individual and corporate income taxes, financial institutions
deposit taxes, motor vehicle fuel, diesel fuel, and compressed fuel
taxes, cigarette taxes, transfer taxes, and charitable gaming taxes.
Sec. 13. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 14. Original sections 77-367, 77-377.01, 77-3,109, 77-3,118,
and 77-27,107, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, sections 77-377.02
and 77-3012, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and sections
9-1,101, 77-4025, and 77-5601, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are
repealed.
Sec. 15. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-16-